California statutes. Education Code
(3) Seventy-five percent beneficiary annuity. This form of payment is the actuarial equivalent of the lump-sum payment modified to be payable over the combined lives of the member and the member’s annuity beneficiary or beneficiaries. Pursuant to Section
 401(a)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code, the member shall not elect this annuity if a beneficiary is more than exactly 19 years younger than the member unless the beneficiary is the member’s spouse or former spouse and the election is pursuant to a determination of community property rights. Upon the death of the member, 75 percent of the monthly amount that was payable to the member shall be paid monthly to the surviving annuity beneficiary or beneficiaries of the member.

(4) Fifty percent beneficiary annuity. This form of payment is the actuarial equivalent of the lump-sum payment modified to be payable over the combined lives of the member and the member’s annuity beneficiary or beneficiaries. Upon the death of the member, one-half of the monthly amount that was payable to the member shall be paid monthly to the member’s surviving annuity beneficiary or beneficiaries.

(5) A
 period certain annuity. This form of payment is an annuity equal to the actuarial equivalent of the balance of credits in the member’s Defined Benefit Supplement account on the date the disability benefit becomes payable. The annuity shall be payable in whole year increments over a period of years specified by the member, from a minimum of three years to a maximum of 10 years subject to life expectancy tables promulgated pursuant to Section 401(a)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code. If the member’s death occurs prior to the end of the period certain, the remaining balance of payments shall be paid to the member’s beneficiary pursuant to Section 25022.

(b) If an annuity beneficiary designated pursuant to paragraph (2), (3), or (4) of subdivision (a) predeceases the member, the annuity shall be paid to the member as the member only annuity that would have been payable had the member elected that form of payment at the commencement of the benefit.
 That member only annuity shall be payable as of the day following the date of the annuity beneficiary’s death upon receipt by the system of proof of the annuity beneficiary’s death. If the annuity beneficiary predeceases the member and the member designates a new option beneficiary pursuant to Section 24323, the new option beneficiary shall be a new annuity beneficiary. The effective date shall be six months following the date notification is received by the board, provided both the member and the new annuity beneficiary are then living. Notice to the board of the death of the annuity beneficiary shall be on a properly executed form provided by the system. The new annuity beneficiary under this paragraph is subject to an actuarial modification of the member only annuity and shall not result in any additional liability to the fund. The new annuity beneficiary shall not be an existing annuity beneficiary.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 297 or 299.2
 of the Family Code, a spouse as described in paragraph (3) or (5) of subdivision (a) does not include the domestic partner of the member, pursuant to Section 7 of Title 1 of the United States Code.

(d) If there is a determination of community property rights as described in Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 22650) of this part on or before December 31, 2006, the member may elect the annuity that is required by the judgment or court order. This part does not permit the member to change the annuity to the detriment of the community property interest of the nonmember spouse.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 42.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

25018.2.

(a) A member who is disabled and elected an annuity pursuant to Section 25018 may elect to change annuities, subject to all of the following:

(1) A member who elected a single life annuity with or without a cash refund feature or elected a period certain annuity may not change his or her annuity.

(2) A member who elected an annuity under paragraph (3) or (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 25018 may elect an annuity under paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 25018.1.

(3) The election by the member under this section is made on or after January 1,
 2007, and prior to July 1, 2007.

(4) The member designates the same annuity beneficiary that was designated under the prior annuity election by the member, if the annuity and the annuity designation were effective on December 31, 2006.

(5) The member and the annuity beneficiary are not afflicted with a known terminal illness and the member declares, under penalty of perjury under the laws of this state, that to the best of his or her knowledge, he or she and the annuity beneficiary are not afflicted with a known terminal illness.

(6) The annuity beneficiary has not predeceased the member as of the effective date of the change in the annuity by the member.

(b) The change in the annuity by the member shall be effective on the date the election is signed,
 provided that the election is on a properly executed form provided by the system and that election is received at the system’s headquarters office within 30 days after the date the election is signed.

(c) After receipt of a member’s election document, the system shall mail an acknowledgment notice to the member that sets forth the new annuity elected by the member.

(d) If the member and the annuity beneficiary are alive and not afflicted with a known terminal illness, a member may cancel the election to change annuities and elect to receive the benefit according to the preexisting annuity election. After cancellation, the member may elect to make a one-time change from the preexisting annuity to any other annuity provided by and subject to the restrictions of paragraph (1), (2), (3), or (4) of subdivision (a). The cancellation or the cancellation and one-time change shall be made
 on a properly executed form provided by the system and shall be received at the system’s headquarters office no later than 30 calendar days following the date of mailing of the acknowledgment notice. If the member elects to make the one-time change provided by this subdivision, the change shall be effective as of the member’s signature date on the initial election to change.

(e) If the system is unable to mail an acknowledgment notice to the member on or before June 1, 2007, or prior to the end of the election period, provided that the member and the annuity beneficiary are alive and not afflicted with a known terminal illness, the system shall allow a member to cancel the election to change annuities and elect to receive the benefit according to the preexisting annuity election. After cancellation, the member may elect to make a one-time change from the preexisting annuity to any other annuity provided by and subject to the restrictions of
 paragraph (1), (2), (3), or (4) of subdivision (a). The cancellation or the cancellation and one-time change may be made after the end of the election period if it is made on a properly executed form provided by the system and is received at the system’s headquarters office no later than 30 calendar days following the date of mailing of the acknowledgment notice. If the member elects to make the one-time change provided by this subdivision, the change shall be effective as of the member’s signature date on the initial election to change.

(f) If the member elects to change his or her annuity as described in subdivision (a), (d), or (e), the annuity of the member shall be modified in a manner determined by the board to prevent any additional liability to the plan.

(g) The member shall not change annuities in derogation of a spouse’s or former spouse’s community property rights as
 specified in a court order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 558, Sec. 49.   (AB 1379)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

25018.5.

When a disabled member returns to work in his or her former position of employment or in a comparable level position and within six months of return experiences a recurrence of the original disability, it shall be considered, for the purpose of determining the duration of the disability, that the condition had its onset as of the date the member first became disabled. The former Defined Benefit Supplement disability benefit under this chapter shall again become payable as of the later of the first day of the month in which the recurrence of the disability occurred or the last day of service for which compensation is payable to the member provided the member complies with the provisions of Section 24003 or 24103, as applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 859, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

25018.6.

(a) A member receiving a disability retirement allowance who elected a beneficiary annuity pursuant to Section 25018.1 with a same-sex spouse or same-sex former spouse designated as annuity beneficiary pursuant to Section 25015 may elect to change his or her annuity subject to the following:

(1) A member who elected the 100 percent beneficiary annuity or the 50 percent beneficiary annuity may elect to change his or her beneficiary annuity to the 75 percent beneficiary annuity described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 25018.1, provided the member’s same-sex spouse or same-sex former spouse is more than exactly 19 years younger than the member.

(2) (A) A member who elected the compound option described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 24300.1 may elect to change his or her beneficiary annuity to the 100 percent beneficiary annuity described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 25018.1, or the 75 percent beneficiary annuity described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 25018.1, provided the member’s same-sex spouse or same-sex former spouse is more than exactly 10 years younger than the member under the 100 percent beneficiary annuity, or more than exactly 19 years younger than the member under the 75 percent beneficiary annuity.

(B) Any change made pursuant to this paragraph shall be subject to the requirements and restrictions of Section 25015.

(3) The annuity change made by the member pursuant to this section is made on or after July 1, 2015, and
 on or before December 31, 2015.

(4) The member married a same-sex spouse, the marriage is or was recognized by the United States government, any state government, or any foreign government, and his or her same-sex spouse or same-sex former spouse was designated as his or her annuity beneficiary prior to July 1, 2015.

(5) The same-sex spouse or same-sex former spouse is a current annuity beneficiary, and the same annuity beneficiary or beneficiaries that were designated for the prior annuity elected by the member remain.

(6) The annuity beneficiary or beneficiaries have not predeceased the member as of the effective date of the annuity change made by the member pursuant to this section.

(b) The annuity change made by a member pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be deemed effective as of the
 effective date of the prior annuity election or June 26, 2013, whichever is later.

(c) The annuity change made by the member pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be on a properly executed form provided by the system subject to the following requirements:

(1) The form is signed and dated by the member and the member’s spouse, if applicable, on or after July 1, 2015, and on or before December 31, 2015.

(2) The date the form is received at the system’s headquarters office is within 30 calendar days after the date of the member’s signature and within 30 calendar days after the date of the spouse’s signature, if applicable.

(d) After receipt
 of a member’s election, the system shall mail an acknowledgment notice to the member that sets forth the new annuity elected by the member.

(e) A member may cancel an annuity change made pursuant to subdivision (a) and elect to receive his or her benefit according to his or her prior annuity election provided the requirements of paragraphs (5) and (6) of subdivision (a) are still met. The cancellation shall become effective as of the date of the initial annuity change pursuant to subdivision (b) subject to the following requirements:

(1) The cancellation is made on a properly executed form provided by the system.

(2) The form includes the signatures of the member and his or her spouse, if applicable, and the
 signatures are dated.

(3) The form is received at the system’s headquarters office within 30 calendar days after the date of the acknowledgment notice described in subdivision (d), regardless of whether the form is received after December 31, 2015.

(f) A member may cancel an initial annuity change made pursuant to subdivision (a) and elect to make one subsequent change from his or her prior annuity election to any other annuity provided by and subject to the restrictions of subdivision (a). The subsequent change shall become effective as of the date of the initial annuity change pursuant to subdivision (b) and subject to the following requirements:

(1) The cancellation and subsequent change are made on a properly
 executed form provided by the system.

(2) The form includes the signatures of the member and his or her spouse, if applicable, and the signatures are dated.

(3) The form is received at the system’s headquarters office within 30 calendar days after the date of the acknowledgment notice described in subdivision (d), regardless of whether the form is received after December 31, 2015.

(g) If a member elects to change his or her annuity pursuant to subdivision (a) or (f), the member’s annuity shall be modified in a manner determined by the board to prevent any additional liability to the plan.

(h) A member shall not change his or her annuity in derogation of
 a spouse’s or former spouse’s community property rights as specified in a court order.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 755, Sec. 72.   (SB 1220)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

25019.

(a) If a member’s disability allowance or disability retirement allowance under this part is terminated, payment of a disability annuity based on the balance of credits transferred from the member’s Defined Benefit Supplement account to the Annuitant Reserve also shall terminate. The member’s Defined Benefit Supplement account shall be credited with the actuarial equivalent of the member’s annuity as of the date the annuity is terminated and the Annuitant Reserve shall be reduced by the amount credited to the member’s account.

(b) If a disability allowance or a service or disability retirement allowance subsequently becomes payable again, an annuity or lump-sum payment based on the remaining balance of credits in the
 member’s Defined Benefit Supplement account at the time of the subsequent disability or service or disability retirement becomes payable and the balance of credits in the member’s Defined Benefit Supplement account shall be transferred to the Annuitant Reserve or paid to the member in the form of a lump-sum payment.

(c) This section shall not apply to a member whose annuity continues pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 25012.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 416, Sec. 24.   (SB 1165)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Final Benefits [25020. - 25023.]

25020.

(a) A final benefit under the Defined Benefit Supplement Program shall become payable when the system receives proof of the member’s death. For a member who died on or after January 1, 2010, no benefit shall be paid to a beneficiary of the member pursuant to other chapters of this part until the final benefit is paid pursuant to this article.

(b) If the member’s death occurs before an annuity under the Defined Benefit Supplement Program becomes payable, the final benefit shall be an amount equal to the balance of credits in the member’s Defined Benefit Supplement account on the date of the member’s death, plus minimum interest credited through the date of payment.

(c) Upon distribution of a final benefit in a lump-sum payment, no other benefit shall be payable under the Defined Benefit Supplement Program to the member’s beneficiary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 304, Sec. 31.   (SB 634)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

25021.

(a) A beneficiary, other than an entity, may elect to receive the final benefit payable under the Defined Benefit Supplement Program as an annuity payable in monthly installments provided the balance of credits in the member’s Defined Benefit Supplement account that is payable to that beneficiary equals at least three thousand five hundred dollars ($3,500).

(b) A beneficiary who elects to receive an annuity under this section shall elect a period certain annuity. This form of payment is an annuity equal to the actuarial equivalent of the balance of credits in the member’s Defined Benefit Supplement account on the date of the member’s death. The annuity shall be payable in whole year increments over a period of years specified by the beneficiary, from a minimum of three years to a maximum of 10 years, but not to exceed the life expectancy of the beneficiary. The beneficiary may designate a payee to receive the remaining balance of payments if the beneficiary’s death occurs prior to the end of the period certain.

(c) A beneficiary may designate a payee who would, upon the death of the beneficiary, be entitled to receive the beneficiary’s accrued annuity allowance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 655, Sec. 60.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

25022.

(a) If the death of a member occurs while the member is receiving an annuity under the Defined Benefit Supplement Program, the final benefit shall be payable in accordance with the terms of the annuity elected by the member.

(b) If the member was receiving a single life annuity without a cash refund feature, a final benefit is not payable other than the accrued annuity for the month in which the member’s death occurred, which shall be paid in a lump sum to the beneficiary designated by the member pursuant to Section 23300 or 23301.

(c) If the member was receiving a single life annuity with a cash refund feature, the
 final benefit shall be payable in a lump sum to the beneficiary designated by the member pursuant to Section 23300 or 23301.

(d) If the member was receiving a joint and survivor annuity, the annuity shall continue to be paid to the surviving designated annuity beneficiary. If the designated annuity beneficiary predeceases the member, a final benefit is not payable.

(e) If the member was receiving a period certain annuity, the remaining balance of payments shall be paid to the beneficiary designated by the member.

(1) If the beneficiary is designated pursuant to Section 23300, the remaining period certain annuity payments shall be made over the amount of time remaining in the period originally elected by the deceased member and shall be made in payments equal to the amount of the annuity payments previously received
 by the deceased member.

(2) If the beneficiary is designated pursuant to Section 23301, the remaining balance of period certain annuity payments shall be made in a lump-sum payment equal to the present value of the balance of payments due over the time remaining in the period originally elected by the deceased member.

(f) A member may designate a beneficiary who would, upon the death of the member, be entitled to the member’s accrued annuity allowance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 558, Sec. 50.   (AB 1379)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

25022.5.

(a) If the death of a nonmember spouse occurs while the nonmember spouse is receiving an annuity under the Defined Benefit Supplement Program, the final benefit shall be payable in accordance with the terms of the annuity elected by the nonmember spouse.

(b) If the nonmember spouse was receiving a single life annuity without a cash refund feature, a final benefit is not payable.

(c) If the nonmember spouse was receiving a single life annuity with a cash refund feature, the final benefit shall be payable in a lump sum to the nonmember spouse’s beneficiary.

(d) If the nonmember spouse was receiving a period certain annuity, the remaining balance of payments shall be paid to the payee designated by the nonmember spouse pursuant to Section 22660.

(1) If the beneficiary is a person, the remaining period certain annuity payments shall be made over the amount of time remaining in the period originally elected by the deceased member and shall be made in payments equal to the amount of the annuity payments previously received by the deceased member.

(2) If the beneficiary is not a person, the remaining balance of period certain annuity payments shall be made in a lump-sum payment equal to the present value of the balance of payments due over the time remaining in the period
 originally elected by the deceased member.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 298, Sec. 20.   (AB 1325)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

25023.

(a) Upon the death of an annuity beneficiary who was receiving an annuity under a joint and survivor annuity elected by the member no further payment shall be made other than the accrued annuity for the month in which the annuity beneficiary’s death occurred, which shall be paid in a lump sum to the payee designated by the annuity beneficiary.

(b) Upon the death of a beneficiary who was receiving a single life annuity without a cash refund feature, no further payment shall be made other than the accrued annuity for the month in which the beneficiary’s death occurred, which shall be paid in a lump sum to the payee designated by the beneficiary.

(c) Upon the death of a beneficiary who was receiving a period certain annuity, the actuarial equivalent of the remaining balance of payments shall be paid in a lump sum to the payee designated by the beneficiary pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 25015.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 375, Sec. 34.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Termination Benefits [25024. - 25025.]

25024.

(a) Upon the termination of all employment to perform creditable service subject to coverage under the plan for a reason other than retirement, disability, or death, a member shall be eligible for a termination benefit under the Defined Benefit Supplement Program.

(b) A member shall submit an application for a termination benefit on a form prescribed by the system. If a member submits an application for a refund of contributions under the Defined Benefit Program, pursuant to Section 23103, that application shall also be deemed an application for a termination benefit. If a member cancels the application for a refund of contributions under the
 Defined Benefit Program, the application for the termination benefit shall also be deemed to have been canceled.

(c) The member’s employer or employers shall certify in a format prescribed by the system that the member’s employment has been terminated, unless the member’s termination of employment occurred 12 consecutive months or more prior to the date the application for a termination benefit is received by the system’s headquarters office. 

(d) The termination benefit shall be a lump-sum payment that is equal to the balance of credits in the member’s Defined Benefit Supplement account.

(e) Upon distribution of the termination benefit, no further benefit shall be payable to the member or the member’s beneficiary under
 the Defined Benefit Supplement Program.

(f) A partial distribution of the balance of credits in a member’s Defined Benefit Supplement account shall not be made, except as provided in Section 25009, 25015, 25016, or 25022.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 96, Sec. 22.   (AB 644)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

25024.5.

A member who is reemployed and again performs creditable service subject to coverage under the plan may not receive a termination benefit under this part if less than five years have elapsed following the date the most recent termination benefit was distributed to the member. This section does not apply to a member who has reached the age at which the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 requires a distribution of benefits.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 661, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

25025.

(a) A termination benefit under the Defined Benefit Supplement Program shall be payable after 180 calendar days have elapsed following the date the member terminated employment as specified in Section 25024.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), the application for the termination benefit shall be automatically canceled if the member performs creditable service within
 180 calendar days following the date of termination of employment.

(c) Subdivision (b) does not apply if the member has reached that age at which the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 requires a distribution of benefits. A member who has reached this age shall receive a distribution commencing on the earlier of the date that the member has met the conditions of subdivision (a) or the conditions of subdivision (h) of Section 24600.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 275, Sec. 15.   (AB 2101)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 39. School Employer Retirement Investment Product Vendor Registration Process and Information Bank [25100. - 25115.]

25100.

(a) The board shall establish a vendor registration process through which information about tax-deferred retirement investment products as described in Section 403(b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 shall be made available for consideration by public employees of all local school districts, community college districts, county offices of education, and state employees of a state employer under the uniform state payroll system, excluding the California State University System, eligible to participate in an annuity contract and custodial account as described in Section 403(b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.

(b) For the purposes of this chapter,
 “403(b) product or 403(b) products” means tax-deferred retirement investment products as described in Section 403(b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, and its subsequent amendments, and complying with applicable California insurance laws, and federal and California securities laws and rules as applied by appropriate regulatory entities.

(c) For the purposes of this chapter:

(1) “Employer” means any local school district, community college district, or county office of education, or any state employer under the uniform state payroll system, excluding the California State University System, with employees eligible to participate in an annuity contract and custodial account as described in Section 403(b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, with the Controller acting on the
 state employer’s behalf.

(2) “Vendor” means:

(A) A public retirement system, broker-dealer, registered investment company, nonbank custodian, or life insurance company qualified to do business in California that provides a 403(b) product. “Vendor” does not include individual registered representatives, brokers, financial planners, or agents.

(B) A statewide employee organization with an active membership primarily composed of persons employed in public education, or its wholly controlled affiliate, that has entered into a legally binding agreement with a bank custodian, as described in Section 401(f)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, for the purpose of offering a custodial account meeting the requirements of Section 403(b)(7)
 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(3) “Nonbank custodian” means a fund custodian, other than a bank, that meets the criteria of a trustee specified in Section 408(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(4) “Broker-dealer” means only those broker-dealers who offer a proprietary 403(b) product or who charge fees that are otherwise not disclosed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 755, Sec. 73.   (SB 1220)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

25101.

A prospective vendor of 403(b) products that offers those products, or the products of other 403(b) vendors, to employers and their eligible employees, shall register those products with the board pursuant to this chapter. Registered vendors shall offer only registered 403(b) products as funding vehicles for 403(b) plans.

(a) Prospective vendors shall be registered with the board based upon a complete response to the disclosures required by this subdivision. This information shall be included in the impartial investment information bank established pursuant to Section 25104. The prospective vendors shall provide the following information:

(1) A statement of experience in California and in other states in providing retirement annuities, custodial account mutual fund arrangements, or other retirement products and related financial services under public employer retirement plans.

(2) A characterization by the vendor of its offering as either an annuity or custodial account, as defined under Sections 403(b)(1) and 403(b)(7) of the Internal Revenue Code, respectively.

(3) A disclosure of all expenses paid directly or indirectly by retirement plan participants, including, but not limited to, penalties for early withdrawals, declining or fixed withdrawal charges, surrender or deposit charges, management fees, and annual fees, supported by documentation as required for prospectus disclosure by the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority and the Securities and Exchange Commission. Vendors shall be required to
 provide information regarding the impact of product fees upon a hypothetical investment, as described in Section 25104.

(4) The types of products, product features, including presence of two tier annuity features, services offered to participants, and information about how to access product prospectuses or other relevant product information.

(5) A discussion of the ability, experience, and commitment of the vendor to provide retirement counseling and education services, including, but not limited to, access to group meetings and individual counseling by various means, including telephone and telecommunications devices for the deaf (TDD), Internet, and face-to-face consultations by registered representatives.

(6) A statement of the financial strength and stability of the vendor, as may be applicable, by identifying
 its ratings assigned by nationally recognized rating services that evaluate the financial strength of life insurance, mutual funds, and other similar companies.

(7) The location of offices and counselors, or method of distribution, of the vendor relative to serving employers and their eligible employees in California.

(8) A description of the ability of the vendor to comply with all applicable provisions of federal and state law governing retirement plans, including minimum distribution requirements and contribution limits.

(9) To the extent applicable, the demonstrated ability of the vendor to offer an appropriate array of accumulation funding options, including, but not limited to, a diversified mix of value, growth, growth and income, hybrid and index funds or accounts across large, mid, and small capitalization
 asset classes, both domestic and international. These investment products may include mutual funds, group or individual annuity contracts, fixed or variable annuity contracts, individual retirement annuities, interests in trust and collective trusts, separate accounts, and other financial instruments.

(10) A discussion of the range of administrative and customer services provided, including asset allocation, accounting and administration of benefits for individual participants, recordkeeping for individual participants, asset purchase, control, and safekeeping, execution of a participant’s instructions as to asset and contribution allocation, calculation of daily net asset values, direct access for participants to their account information, periodic reporting to active participants, not less than quarterly, on their account balances and transactions, and compliance with the standard of care applicable in the provision of investment services and
 consistent with federal law.

(11) Certification by the vendor that the information provided to the board accurately reflects the provisions of the Section 403(b) products they register pursuant to this chapter.

(b) Registration may not be conditioned upon the content of the information.

(c) Vendors shall supply information and data in the format required by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 558, Sec. 51.   (AB 1379)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

25102.

Registration shall be offered to vendors once annually, and renewal of registration shall be required at least once every five years thereafter for vendors that wish to continue to participate. The board shall provide public notice prior to the initial registration, annual registration, and registration renewal periods. The board may require, through a password-based update system that allows vendors to access the registration list for the purposes of updating their product information, or through other means, an update of the information required to be provided under Section 25101 with each registration renewal. Registered vendors shall submit to the board within the time required by the Securities and Exchange Commission an amendment to the information required to be provided under Section 25101 to reflect material changes to the products or services offered that occur between registration or renewal periods. Registered vendors may register additional 403(b) products with the board between registration or renewal periods by providing the board the information required under Section 25101 and fees required under subdivision (c) of Section 25108. Upon receipt of information reflecting material changes or additions to the products or services offered by registered vendors that occur between registration or renewal periods, the board shall reflect those changes in the impartial investment information bank established pursuant to Section 25104 within the time required by the Securities and Exchange Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1095, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

25103.

(a) The board may remove a vendor from the registry if the vendor submits materially inaccurate information to the board, does not remit assessed fees within 60 days, or fails to submit notice of material changes to its registered investment products, pursuant to Section 25102. Vendors found to have submitted materially inaccurate information to the board shall be allowed 60 days to correct the information. The board may refer vendors that submit information required under Section 25102 that is materially inaccurate and may constitute conduct prohibited by the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority and the California Department of Insurance to those entities.

(b) The board shall
 remove a vendor from the registry if the vendor is not licensed or has had its license revoked by the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority or the California Department of Insurance for engaging in conduct prohibited by those entities.

(c) The board shall establish an appeals process pursuant to Section 22219 for vendors that are denied registration or removed from the registry.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 558, Sec. 52.   (AB 1379)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

25104.

(a) The board shall maintain an impartial investment information bank, via an Internet Web site, containing the information required by Section 25101 about the retirement investment products offered by each registered vendor and objective comparisons of vendors and types of products.

(b) The information bank shall include information on investment performance based upon the investment’s average annual total return, as measured by a nationally recognized rating service selected by the board for standard periods of time of not less than one year.

(c) The Web site shall include a table showing, for each registered fund, the total fee cost in dollars incurred by a shareholder who initially invested ten thousand dollars ($10,000), earned a 5 percent rate of return for one, five, 10, 15, and 20 year time periods. This table shall be accompanied by a disclaimer that the rate of return is for purposes of illustrating the respective impacts of different fee amounts on each investment, and is not to predict future investment returns.

(d) The board shall have the authority to organize data, but may not subjectively rank or give preference to a vendor or product.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1095, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

25105.

The board shall include notice of the existence of, and the Internet Web site address for, the impartial investment information bank in each newsletter sent to members. The board shall include a notice in the individual account statements of members of the Defined Benefit Program and participants of the Cash Balance Benefit Program that explains the purpose and Web site address of the impartial investment information bank.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1095, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

25106.

The board shall design the information bank Internet Web site and include retirement investment product plan information and education materials taken from and referenced to the Internal Revenue Service, the Securities and Exchange Commission, the National Association of Insurance Commissioners, and other applicable governmental or regulatory agencies. Information shall be presented and used in a manner that is consistent with the rules of those agencies and with rules of the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority. The information shall be offered as a preface to the vendor information required in Section 25101. The preface shall include, but shall not be limited to, the following information:

(a) An
 explanation of Section 403(b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.

(b) The retirement investment products that may be purchased under Section 403(b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, and with definitions of those products.

(c) Definitions or explanations of all fees referred to in the investment information bank.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 558, Sec. 53.   (AB 1379)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

25107.

A vendor may not charge a fee associated with a registered 403(b) product that is not disclosed, pursuant to Section 25101.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 912, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

25108.
